Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-112
Consolidation; approval at election; certification.

If at an election held pursuant to section 15-111 a majority of the vote cast in a city of the second class or village shall be in favor of consolidation, the result shall be certified to the city council of the city of the primary class. If the city council of such city of the primary class approves of the consolidation, an ordinance shall be passed extending the limits of such city to include all the territory of the city of the second class or village voting for consolidation, and the city or cities, village or villages, so consolidated with the city of the primary class shall become a part thereof.

Laws 1921, c. 202, § 2, p. 730;

C.S.1922, § 3791;

C.S.1929, § 15-112;

R.S.1943, § 15-112;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 15.